Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Legend Drug Repository Program

194A.450.
Definitions for KRS 194A.450 to 194A.458. [Renumbered]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 1, effective July 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 136, § 12, effective June 29, 2017.

194A.452.
Legend Drug Repository Program to be established — Purpose — Permitted donations — Voluntary participation — Handling fee — Distribution. [Renumbered]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 2, effective July 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 136, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

194A.454.
Requirements for accepting and dispensing legend drug or administration supplies. [Renumbered]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 3, effective July 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 85, § 32, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 136, § 14, effective June 29, 2017.

194A.456.
Immunity from civil liability — Exceptions. [Renumbered]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 4, effective July 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 136, § 156, effective June 29, 2017.

194A.458.
Required administrative regulations. [Renumbered]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 5, effective July 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 136, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.